src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-riqddw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - riʼddõ: # Verb 33 'eng /est koristada/fin' - full paradigm
     riʼddõ+V+Inf: [riʼddõ, riddõ]
     riʼddõ+V+Ger: [riʼddõs, riddõs]
     riʼddõ+V+Sup: [riʼddõm, riddõm]
     riʼddõ+V+Sup+Ine: [riʼddõmõs, riddõmõs]
     riʼddõ+V+Sup+Ela: [riʼddõmõst, riddõmõst]
     riʼddõ+V+Sup+Tra: [riʼddõmõks, riddõmõks]
     riʼddõ+V+Sup+Abe: [riʼddõmõt, riddõmõt]
     riʼddõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ridūb
     riʼddõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [riʼddõt, riddõt]
     riʼddõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ridūbõd
     riʼddõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ridīz
     riʼddõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ridīzt, ridīztõ]
     riʼddõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ridīzt, ridīztõ]
     riʼddõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [riʼd, rid]
     riʼddõ+V+Cond+Sg3: [riʼddõks, riddõks]
     riʼddõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [riʼd, rid]
     riʼddõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [riʼd, rid]
     riʼddõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [riʼddõgid, riddõgid]
     riʼddõ+V+Jus+Sg3: [riʼddõg, riddõg]
     riʼddõ+V+Quo+Sg3: [riʼddiji, riddiji]
     riʼddõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [riʼddõn, riddõn]
     riʼddõ+V+PssPrfPrc: [riʼdtõd, ridtõd]
